Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.06.010

Each optional plan of government declared complete form of government.

Each of the optional plans of government authorized by chapter 35A.12 RCW and chapter 35A.13 RCW, with any amendments thereto, is declared to be a complete and separate plan of government authorized by the legislature for submission to the voters of a municipality or for adoption by resolution of the legislative body thereof in the manner provided herein, and is additional to the plans of government existing prior to the time this title takes effect.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.06.010.]